dictionary/es_ANY.dic
abundante/tS
aclarar/REDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÍÎÙÚÛñòôøA
acostumbrado/GhS
activo/opGSflk
adivinar/REDÀÁÂÄÅÆÌÙñòA
adquirir/XDÀÂÈáT
adumbrar/REDA
aflorar/REDÀA
agudo/SGr
ahogado/hSG
alcohol/SO
alear/REDA
alhucema/NS
alpino/uSG
amalgamar/REDÀÄA
amarilla/MS
amparador/GSh
ancho/jSG
andamio/SC
andina/u
andino/GuS
andino/uGS
animar/pREDÀÁÂÄÅÆÎñòôøA
antes/t
apelable/Sk
apostemar/REDA
aprensión/hS
aproches/v
arbitrar/REDT
arco/Sr
argumento/Sv
arrendador/sGS
arrendar/IRDA
asignar/REDÀÁÂÃÄÆÇTA
astado/iGS
astrosa/h
atlántica/u
atlántico/uSG
autenticar/REDA
autor/fGS
avanzada/NS
aviso/Snv
azadón/HS
babis/O
balcón/SCN
bancos/p
bandas/a
barco/NCS
bastarda/NS
bata/H
bebedor/iSG
bifurcar/REDA
biográfica/d
biográfico/GdS
blasfemar/REDT
bloqueo/Sv
boalar/CS
boca/NSU
bolladura/aS
boratera/s
borrón/SN
botadura/ipS
brazo/Sba
brochado/GSi
buses/d
caballo/CS
cabe/Sa
cabezo/SH
cachorro/NSU
cadencia/qS
caído/gSG
calabozo/CS
caladura/ilS
caldo/NS
calendarizar/REDA
callado/GSU
calle/jS
calza/rS
cama/brS
cámara/bpS
cambiable/lS
cano/jGgS
cantador/iGS
capilla/bS
capsular/eS
cara/NS
carbonato/Se
car/dS
cargada/i
cargadero/Sh
carga/hprS
cario/SGn
carreta/LNS
carros/c
cartón/SC
casamiento/iSh
casquete/HS
castrar/REDÀñA
causal/KS
cauta/k
caza/LS
cebada/NS
ceja/rS
celosa/po
celular/sSl
cepilladura/aS
cerca/jS
cercos/r
cerrada/ir
cerrado/iGSr
cerradura/iS
cesamiento/So
cesionario/GSf
chalación/s
chapa/SU
chico/GNS
ciclónico/GSc
ciclo/Se
cilíndrica/q
cilindro/qS
cimero/iGS
cincho/HS
cinta/jmS
cintos/po
circuito/mS
círculo/qS
circunnavegar/REDA
clara/nj
clerical/cS
coadunar/REDA
cocción/gS
coco/mS
cogedor/pGraS
cogedor/rSp
cogedura/jS
colombina/n
combatiente/wS
compadre/CS
comparado/kGS
compilar/REDÀA
complaciente/dS
composición/hS
comunicación/klS
comunismo/Sc
conceptivo/SGcv
concepto/SO
condenar/REDÀÁÆÍñòTA
conductor/tGqS
conexa/k
conjunto/sS
conocido/hGSp
conquista/pS
constante/kS
conversable/hSk
convexa/e
convexo/eGS
copa/NSU
copia/mS
coproducir/XDA
corchea/qS
cordón/HSN
coro/Sjgb
correccional/OS
corriente/FS
corrosiva/c
cortadura/jpS
corvadura/iS
cosmos/m
costal/lSs
cotizar/REDT
creación/opS
crecimiento/Sgpa
credibilidad/kS
cresta/LS
cristiana/c
cristo/bSc
cromática/a
cruzamiento/jS
cuaderno/SN
cubierta/hrS
culto/qkGS
curación/dS
curador/GoS
curso/kSufp
cursor/nS
dado/fS
decoroso/GSk
dejada/SM
delirio/sS
dentado/ihSG
dental/lS
deportiva/c
deslizante/Sc
desplegar/IRDT
destrucción/dS
determinación/kSnd
dicha/rbp
diente/rS
difunto/qSG
digno/fGkS
dilecto/nSG
diluviana/b
dino/GiS
directorio/Ss
disipar/REDÀT
do/gS
domable/kS
dominante/Sts
dominio/dfsSn
donante/fS
doncella/MS
dones/ef
doses/j
dotada/tk
dotado/tkGS
droga/LS
dual/OS
ductiva/fokg
duelo/SC
edición/pS
efecto/nSg
eje/gqS
elegir/XDÀÁÂÈT
eminencia/tS
eminente/St
empeño/Sh
empleado/wGS
engrudamiento/hS
enjuta/M
entender/hrstIRTDÀÁÃÄÂÐÑñòù
equiparar/REDÀÁÄT
erina/sS
errada/h
esa/nS
escaro/Sg
escota/NS
escuela/dS
esférica/q
espaciosa/g
espejo/Sg
espolón/HS
estadiza/n
esta/nS
estatal/Sl
estima/dSh
evitable/kS
fabulación/fS
faradio/Sm
fascismo/cS
faz/rSl
fecundar/REDÀT
ficha/Sm
fidelidad/kS
figuración/hSf
fijo/aSGn
filiación/aS
filibustero/OS
filme/mS
fina/fSptj
fino/pSGjt
firma/bS
flagelar/dREDÁÄñ
flora/LS
fluencia/aSkft
focal/Se
formación/kuSgf
formador/gGpukS
formativa/ukp
formativo/kGSpu
forro/CS
fraternidad/fS
fruta/SNL
funda/o
fundo/SGo
fusa/qS
futbolista/wS
garganta/NS
gato/HNS
generador/GpS
generativa/g
género/Ss
genio/kS
giganta/MS
gigante/SO
gordo/GSU
gotera/eS
gracejo/Sa
gráfica/m
gráfico/mGS
gramática/o
granado/hSG
guerra/nSb
hastiosa/i
hecho/fS
helada/LS
héroe/tS
hilados/hr
hipotecar/REDT
hisopo/NHS
hispánica/n
histórico/nSG
hombre/qotS
honesto/GSh
honras/gh
humeral/St
humor/OS
ida/Ss
incrustar/hREDAÀÁÂñ
insular/Sl
intendencia/stSr
interés/hS
intoxicación/dhS
inyectar/REDÀÁÂÃÄÅÆT
isla/NS
jera/Sp
jofaina/aS
joya/SL
judicial/Sn
jugador/wSG
juicio/nbS
junta/f
labial/eS
ladrillador/Si
lancho/HCS
lateral/efS
legalidad/kS
legislador/fGS
lientera/LS
limado/sS
lino/CS
liosa/e
lioso/eGS
lirio/gSf
listada/aj
listado/aGSj
llana/c
local/SO
locutor/lGS
loquios/f
lúcida/u
lúcido/uGS
luciente/uSp
luz/SU
maderamiento/Si
magra/MS
mandante/gS
manejable/kS
manipulador/Sm
marido/CNSH
marina/us
marinismo/sS
marino/GuSs
marrida/ah
marrón/HS
marte/NS
matrimonial/nS
maxilar/slS
medalla/SU
mediador/pGSl
medio/SlG
mejoramiento/Sh
melamina/s
memorativo/pGSf
menospreciar/REDÀÄT
mensual/eS
mercados/t
meridiano/GSb
mesa/Sopr
meses/j
metalista/eS
metal/qS
meteoro/SO
metimiento/Sjo
minera/LS
moción/dSpof
moderante/SO
moral/cSak
moral/KS
mordimiento/Sp
mosqueta/SL
mostrador/gGS
motor/doSGe
motriz/Sd
móvil/Sd
muda/SM
mueble/CS
muerto/GSn
mundicia/kS
mundos/s
muro/bS
musco/SGa
muscular/Sl
mutable/kSuf
nacionalismo/lS
nacionalización/Sl
nacional/OS
natural/ckSfr
neptunio/O
niña/MS
normal/KS
notación/aSf
nudos/jh
numerario/SGt
nuncio/alS
obediencia/hS
oficial/sS
ojera/Sb
onda/Sm
organismo/mS
oscuro/jGSU
óxido/Se
paciente/kS
pagador/SGao
paje/NH
palabra/SL
palco/bS
paleta/NLS
panes/j
papado/cS
parada/pS
parador/nGS
parche/HS
parlamentaria/lc
parlamentario/cGSl
paro/CS
parte/Sv
paseo/SU
pecho/hSpb
pedante/OS
pedazo/NSU
pegado/iS
pelagianismo/qS
pelos/pr
pendiente/gS
penúltimo/SGb
peón/CS
percusión/pS
perdurable/JS
período/Sq
perra/LS
pesada/SMN
piedad/Sok
pierna/jSU
piqueta/SN
pistolete/HS
placable/kaS
placa/SU
plastia/Sd
pleita/Si
polar/eS
polla/MS
polvorizar/REDT
ponedor/kuGoS
porquera/LS
portada/bS
poseer/hREDÀÄÅÌñò
posición/ktoSlnabpg
postura/aSk
pote/CS
potente/nSk
precio/hrSa
preciosa/q
prensor/pGS
presidente/wS
procesador/mS
progreso/SO
pronto/GSU
proyecto/Sb
publicano/Sp
puerto/bS
puesta/aSo
puesto/kprS
puñete/HS
pútrido/cSG
quesera/LS
racional/SO
rama/SUN
rana/SUN
ratas/o
rayada/s
realismo/tS
recta/f
recta/qS
redistribuir/IRDÀT
redonda/NSM
reemplazable/kS
regidor/fGS
regulación/dS
relación/Sfl
religioso/kGSc
relojera/LS
renglonadura/Sj
réplica/Sv
restringir/REDÀÄT
risa/SU
ritual/SO
rocadero/Sg
roda/SN
rosa/SU
ros/fa
sacar/aijpREDÀÁÂÃÄÅÇÌÍÎÙÚÛñòôø
saco/SU
sala/bS
saliente/Sr
salva/C
salve/GKS
sanable/Sks
sargada/a
seca/p
sección/lS
segur/KS
selladura/Sg
semanal/eS
semitismo/cS
sentida/f
sentimiento/nSpaf
seres/i
servicio/dS
sexual/eSa
sifilítico/GSc
signatura/Sa
sillera/LS
sillete/HS
simio/oS
simplificar/REDÀÁÄT
sincera/k
sonántico/fSG
soneto/SN
sorda/MS
sudor/pS
sufragio/OS
sugestión/Sd
sulfuro/eS
surco/Sj
tangente/FS
taque/aS
tejimiento/jS
te/M
tena/iS
tendencia/kSn
tergiversar/REDÀÄT
terminación/gS
terrón/HS
tesorero/wGS
texto/nSf
tiberino/uGS
título/Ss
todo/rS
tónica/o
tonos/q
torcedura/hSp
torda/N
tornera/LS
tracción/gSpfa
transmisible/kS
trazable/kSJ
treta/Sp
trompo/HNS
tuberculosa/c
uro/aS
uso/CS
vacante/FS
vampiro/SO
variable/SJ
velos/h
ventano/HNSC
ventor/GSlk
verificar/REDÀÄT
vertibilidad/fS
viento/Sra
vinatera/LS
visión/Snopt
visita/pS
visual/KS
viva/q
viviente/rStf
vocación/aokfSp
vocal/qS
voto/gS
vuelta/jpS
zamboa/aS
zambombo/HS
zumo/SN
